Utah statutes.
63G-14-301.   Disqualification from program.

(1)  A resident immigrant is disqualified from the program if after becoming a resident immigrant the individual:

(a)  is convicted of, pleads guilty to, pleads no contest to, pleads guilty in a similar manner to, or is resolved by diversion or its equivalent to a felony or class A misdemeanor; or

(b)  violates the terms and restrictions of the program.

(2)  In accordance with Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the department may bring an action to terminate a resident immigrant's participation in the program for a violation described in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 20, 2011 General Session

